Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB871.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 404. Notice of Discharge Endangering Public Health or Environment.--(a) A person who spills, discharges or 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 releases a substance into the waters of this Commonwealth, or on a location from which the substance is likely to enter the waters of this Commonwealth, taking into account any control and remedial measures, shall notify the department if the spill, discharge or release is not authorized by a permit from the department and is likely to render the receiving waters harmful to public health or the environment as determined by reportable quantities or other readily ascertainable standards adopted by regulation under subsection (c).(b) No later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section, the Environmental Quality Board shall publish for public comment proposed regulations establishing reportable quantities or other readily ascertainable standards by which a person under subsection (a) may determine whether a spill, discharge or release is likely to render the receiving waters harmful to public health or the environment.(c) No later than three hundred sixty-five days after the effective date of this section, the Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate final regulations establishing reportable quantities or other readily ascertainable standards by which a person under subsection (a) may determine whether a spill, discharge or release is likely to render the receiving waters harmful to public health or the environment.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0871PN0907 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425